California, session 20252026, AB1685.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1808 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:1808. (a) Except where a specific provision of law prohibits the disclosure of records or information or provides for confidentiality, all records of the department relating to the registration of vehicles, other information contained on an application for a driver’s license, abstracts of convictions, and abstracts of accident reports required to be sent to the department in Sacramento, except for abstracts of accidents where, in the opinion of a reporting officer, another individual was at fault, shall be open to public inspection during office hours. All abstracts of accident reports shall be available to law enforcement agencies and courts of competent jurisdiction.(b) The department shall make available or disclose abstracts of convictions and abstracts of accident reports required to be sent to the department in Sacramento, as described in subdivision (a), if the date of the occurrence is not later than the following:(1) Ten years for a violation pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 191.5 of the Penal Code, or Section 23140, 23152, or 23153.(2) Seven years for a violation designated as two points pursuant to Section 12810, except as provided in paragraph (1) of this subdivision.(3) Three years for accidents and all other violations.(c) The department shall make available or disclose suspensions and revocations of the driving privilege while the suspension or revocation is in effect and for three years following termination of the action or reinstatement of the privilege, except that driver’s license suspension actions taken pursuant to former Sections 13202.6 and 13202.7, Section 17520 of the Family Code, or Section 256 or former Section 11350.6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall be disclosed only during the actual time period in which the suspension is in effect.(d) The department shall not make available or disclose a suspension or revocation that has been judicially set aside or stayed.(e) The department shall not make available or disclose personal information about a person unless the disclosure is in compliance with the Driver’s Privacy Protection Act of 1994 (18 U.S.C. Sec. 2721 et seq.). However, a disclosure is subject to the prohibition in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 12800.5.(f) The department shall make available or disclose to the courts and law enforcement agencies a conviction of Section 23103, as specified in Section 23103.5, or a conviction of Section 23140, 23152, or 23153, or Section 655 of the Harbors and Navigation Code, or paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 192 of the Penal Code for a period of 10 years from the date of the offense for the purpose of imposing penalties mandated by this code, or by other applicable provisions of California law.(g) The department shall make available or disclose to the courts and law enforcement agencies a conviction of Section 191.5, or subdivision (a) of Section 192.5 of the Penal Code, punished as a felony, for the purpose of imposing penalties mandated by Section 23550.5, or by other applicable provisions of California law.SECTION 1.SEC. 2. Section 12810 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:12810. In determining the violation point count, the following shall apply:(a) A conviction of failure to stop in the event of an accident in violation of Section 20001 or 20002 shall be given a value of two points.(b) A conviction of a violation of Section 23152 or 23153 shall be given a value of two points.(c) A conviction of reckless driving shall be given a value of two points.(d) (1) A conviction of a violation of subdivision (b) of Section 191.5 or paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 192 of the Penal Code, or of Section 2800.2 or 2800.3, subdivision (b) of Section 21651, subdivision (b) of Section 22348, subdivision (a) or (c) of Section 23109, Section 23109.1, or Section 31602 of this code, shall be given a value of two points.(2) A conviction of a violation of subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 23140 shall be given a value of two points.(3) A conviction of a violation of paragraph (1) or (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 192 subdivision (a) of Section 191.5 of the Penal Code shall be given a value of three points.(e) A conviction of a violation of Section 14601, 14601.1, 14601.2, 14601.3, or 14601.5 shall be given a value of two points.(f) Except as provided in subdivision (i), any other traffic conviction involving the safe operation of a motor vehicle upon the highway shall be given a value of one point.(g) A traffic accident in which the operator is deemed by the department to be responsible shall be given a value of one point.(h) A conviction of a violation of Section 27360 or 27360.5 shall be given a value of one point.(i) (1) A violation of paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 40001 shall not result in a violation point count being given to the driver if the driver is not the owner of the vehicle.(2) A conviction of a violation of paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 12814.6, subdivision (a) of Section 21116, Section 21207.5, 21708, 21710, 21716, 23120, 24800, or 26707 shall not be given a violation point count.(3) A violation of subdivision (d) of Section 21712 shall not result in a violation point count.(4) A violation of Section 23136 shall not result in a violation point count.(5) A violation of Section 38301, 38301.3, 38301.5, 38304.1, or 38504.1 shall not result in a violation point count.(j) A conviction for only one violation arising from one occasion of arrest or citation shall be counted in determining the violation point count for the purposes of this section.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Line 3.___________________